Nebraska, session 109, LB215.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 10 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Clean Slate Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a) After individuals convicted of nonviolent or less violent crimes
have served their sentences and obeyed the law long enough to demonstrate
their rehabilitation, such individuals' criminal records should not stand
as an impediment to the necessities of life, such as employment, housing,
and education. However, criminal justice agencies need access to all
criminal history record information in order to effectively carry out
their duties to protect the public;
(b) The state shall provide a clean slate remedy, as set forth under
the Clean Slate Act, in order to:
(i) Provide an incentive for offenders to remain crime-free;
(ii) Provide hope to offenders who are trying to rehabilitate
themselves;
(iii) Save the state money that must be spent when offenders
recidivate; and
(iv) Ensure appropriate access to criminal history record
information by criminal justice agencies and for other purposes essential
to the health and safety of the public; and
(c) To the extent possible, the Clean Slate Act should be
implemented with low cost to the courts, criminal justice agencies, and
individuals seeking relief under the act.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Clean Slate Act, the definitions found
in the Security, Privacy, and Dissemination of Criminal History
Information Act and sections 4 and 5 of this act apply.
Sec. 4. The terms conviction and adjudication:
(1) Include a conviction or adjudication following trial or entry of
a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere and include a forfeiture of
bail, bond, or other security deposited to secure appearance by a person
charged with an offense;
-2-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
(2) When used in reference to an offense committed in another
jurisdiction, include convictions and adjudications by any village, town,
city, state, territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United
States, by the United States Government, or by court-martial or other
military tribunal; and
(3) When used in determining whether a person has been convicted of,
or adjudicated for, an offense during the eligibility period described in
section 6 or 7 of this act, do not include convictions or adjudications
(i) pardoned, (ii) set aside under section 29-2264, or (iii) set aside,
expunged, or otherwise nullified by another jurisdiction through a
procedure comparable in effect to section 29-2264.
Sec. 5. (1) Qualified offense means an offense under Nebraska law,
an ordinance of a Nebraska city or village, or a county resolution that
is:
(a) A Class III, IIIA, or IV felony, including unclassified felonies
under section 28-107;
(b) A misdemeanor, including unclassified misdemeanors under section
28-107; or
(c) An infraction.
(2) Qualified offense does not include any of the following
offenses:
(a) Illegal disclosure of juror names, section 25-1673;
(b) Tampering with a jury list, section 25-1676;
(c) Motor vehicle homicide, section 28-306, except for a misdemeanor
violation;
(d) Assault by strangulation or suffocation, section 28-310.01;
(e) Criminal child enticement, section 28-311;
(f) Terroristic threats, section 28-311.01;
(g) Stalking, section 28-311.04, except for a misdemeanor violation;
(h) A violation of section 28-311.08;
(i) Violation of harassment protection order, section 28-311.09;
-3-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
(j) Violation of sexual assault protection order, section 28-311.11;
(k) False imprisonment in the first or second degree, section 28-314
or 28-315;
(l) Sexual abuse by a school employee, section 28-316.01;
(m) Any sexual assault or sexual abuse offense, sections 28-317 to
28-322.05;
(n) Any domestic assault, section 28-323, except for a misdemeanor
violation of subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-323;
(o) Any violation relating to abortion, sections 28-325 to 28-345
and section 28-347.04;
(p) Failure to report under Adult Protective Services Act, section
28-384;
(q) Knowing and intentional abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a
vulnerable or senior adult, section 28-386;
(r) Any violation of the Homicide of the Unborn Child Act, sections
28-388 to 28-394;
(s) Any violation of the Assault of an Unborn Child Act, sections
28-395 to 28-3,101;
(t) Intentional or reckless performance of or attempt to perform an
abortion in violation of the Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act,
section 28-3,108;
(u) Prohibited acts related to methamphetamine, chemical substances,
and paraphernalia, section 28-457;
(v) Arson in the second or third degree, section 28-503 or 28-504;
(w) Violation of Counterfeit Airbag Prevention Act, section 28-644;
(x) Incest, section 28-703;
(y) Child abuse, section 28-707;
(z) Willful failure to report abused or neglected children, section
28-717;
(aa) Solicitation of prostitution, section 28-801.01, except for a
misdemeanor violation;
-4-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
(bb) Keeping a place of prostitution used by a person under the age
of eighteen years, section 28-804;
(cc) Enticement by electronic communication device, section 28-833;
(dd) Resisting arrest, section 28-904, except for a misdemeanor
violation;
(ee) Operating a motor vehicle or vessel to avoid arrest, section
28-905, except for a misdemeanor violation;
(ff) Escape or permitting an escape from official detention, section
28-912;
(gg) Accessory to escape of juvenile from custody of Office of
Juvenile Services, section 28-912.01;
(hh) Introducing escape implements or contraband, section 28-913;
(ii) Perjury and subornation of perjury, section 28-915;
(jj) Bribery, section 28-917;
(kk) Bribery of a witness or witness accepting bribe or benefit,
section 28-918;
(ll) Tampering with a witness or informant or jury tampering,
section 28-919;
(mm) Bribery of a juror or juror accepting bribe or benefit, section
28-920;
(nn) Tampering with physical evidence, section 28-922;
(oo) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state
correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services
employee, or a health care professional in the third degree, section
28-931;
(pp) Assault on an officer, an emergency responder, a state
correctional employee, a Department of Health and Human Services
employee, or a health care professional using a motor vehicle, section
28-931.01;
(qq) Assault by a confined person, section 28-932;
(rr) Assault with a bodily fluid against a public safety officer,
-5-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
28-934;
(ss) Animal fighting, prohibited acts, section 28-1005;
(tt) Knowing or intentional ownership or possession of animal
fighting paraphernalia, section 28-1005.01;
(uu) Abandonment, cruel neglect, or cruel mistreatment of an animal
or harassment of a police animal, section 28-1009, except for a Class IV
misdemeanor violation;
(vv) Indecency with an animal, section 28-1010;
(ww) Violation of court order related to felony animal abuse
conviction, section 28-1019;
(xx) Gambling debt collection, section 28-1105.01;
(yy) Unlawful possession of a firearm by a prohibited juvenile
offender, section 28-1204.05, except for a Class IV felony violation;
(zz) Possession of a deadly weapon other than a firearm during
commission of a felony, section 28-1205;
(aaa) Carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission
of a dangerous misdemeanor, section 28-1205, except for a misdemeanor
violation;
(bbb) Possession of a deadly weapon other than a firearm by a
prohibited person, section 28-1206;
(ccc) Unlawful possession of explosive materials in the first
degree, section 28-1215;
(ddd) Unlawful sale of explosives, section 28-1217;
(eee) Obtaining an explosives permit through false representations,
section 28-1219;
(fff) Possession of a destructive device, section 28-1220;
(ggg) Threatening the use of explosives or placing a false bomb,
section 28-1221;
(hhh) Using explosives to damage or destroy property, section
28-1223;
(iii) Concealment of death to prevent determination of cause or
-6-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
circumstances of death, section 28-1302;
(jjj) Unauthorized computer access creating grave risk of death,
section 28-1343.01;
(kkk) Operation of aircraft while under the influence of alcohol or
drugs, third or subsequent offense, section 28-1469;
(lll) Violation of the Sex Offender Registration Act, section
29-4011;
(mmm) Placing burning materials or items likely to cause injury on
highways, third or subsequent offense, section 39-311;
(nnn) Violation of domestic abuse protection order, section 42-924;
(ooo) Knowingly and intentionally dispensing alcohol in any manner
to minors or incompetents resulting in serious bodily injury or death
caused by the minors' consumption or impaired condition, section
53-180.05;
(ppp) Owner of a dangerous dog which inflicts serious bodily injury,
second or subsequent offense, section 54-622.01;
(qqq) Violation of prohibitions relating to dangerous dogs, section
54-623;
(rrr) Abandonment, cruel neglect, or cruel mistreatment of a
livestock animal, section 54-903, except for a misdemeanor violation;
(sss) Violation of court order not to own or possess a livestock
animal, section 54-909;
(ttt) Driving under the influence with a prior felony conviction for
driving under the influence, section 60-6,196.01;
(uuu) Any offense punishable under section 60-6,197.03, except for a
Class W misdemeanor;
(vvv) Causing serious bodily injury to another person or an unborn
child while driving under the influence, section 60-6,198;
(www) Prohibited acts relating to ignition interlock device, section
60-6,211.11;
(xxx) Violations regarding children in foster care, section 71-1905;
-7-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
(yyy) Violation of Children's Residential Facilities and Placing
Licensure Act, section 71-1950;
(zzz) Threatening or attempting to influence a member or an employee
of the Board of Parole, section 83-198;
(aaaa) Operation of a motor vehicle while under the influence with
disabled, bypassed, or altered ignition interlock device or without an
ignition interlock device or permit in violation of Board of Pardons
order, section 83-1,127.02; and
(bbbb) Threatening or attempting to influence a member of the Board
of Pardons, section 83-1,133;
(3) Qualified offense does not include any offense for which:
(a) Registration is required under the Sex Offender Registration
Act;
(b) Relief has already been provided under section 29-3523 or
sections 43-2,108.01 to 43-2,108.05; or
(c) The penalty has been enhanced under section 29-2221.
(4) Qualified offense does not include any other offense involving
as an element of the offense:
(a) Sexual contact or sexual penetration, as those terms are defined
in section 28-318; or
(b) The infliction of serious bodily injury, as defined in section
28-109, or death.
(5) Qualified offense does not include:
(a) Attempt, under section 28-201, to commit any offense excluded
from the definition of a qualified offense under this section;
(b) Attempt, under section 28-201, to commit any offense when such
attempt is punishable as a Class IIIA felony or higher;
(c) Conspiracy, under section 28-202, to commit any offense excluded
from the definition of a qualified offense under this section;
(d) Accessory to felony, under section 28-204, except for accessory
violations punishable as a Class IV felony or a misdemeanor;
-8-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
(e) Aiding consummation of felony, under section 28-205, for any
felony excluded from the definition of a qualified offense under this
section; and
(f) Aiding or abetting commission of an offense, under section
28-206, for any offense excluded from the definition of a qualified
offense under this section.
Sec. 6. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, a person shall automatically
be eligible for clean slate relief under section 8 of this act for a
qualified offense that is a misdemeanor if:
(a) The qualified offense was committed on or after January 1, 2021;
(b) Such person has not been convicted of, or adjudicated for, a
misdemeanor or felony anywhere in the United States during the
eligibility period described in subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) Such person has paid all court-ordered financial obligations
related to such qualified offense.
(2) Eligibility for relief under this section shall be determined
internally and administratively by the State Court Administrator and does
not require involvement by the person in interest.
(3) The eligibility period for qualified offenses under this section
shall be:
(a) For conviction of a qualified offense that is a Class I or II
misdemeanor, ten years following the date of conviction;
(b) For an adjudication for a qualified offense that is a Class I or
II misdemeanor, seven years following the date of conviction; or
(c) For a conviction of, or adjudication for, a qualified offense
that is a Class III or lower misdemeanor, five years following the date
of conviction or adjudication.
(4) No later than thirty days following expiration of the
eligibility period under subsection (3) of this section, the State Court
Administrator shall determine if a person convicted of, or adjudicated
for, a qualified offense described in subsection (1) of this section is
-9-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
eligible for clean slate relief under this section. If the State Court
Administrator determines that a person is eligible, the State Court
Administrator shall, within such same thirty-day period, notify the court
of conviction or adjudication of such determination.
(5) Each court of conviction or adjudication shall, on a monthly
basis, issue orders for clean slate relief under section 8 of this act
for each person for whom the court received a notification under
subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The State Court Administrator is not required to proceed under
subsection (4) of this section if the State Court Administrator
determines that the person in interest is deceased.
Sec. 7. (1) A person convicted of, or adjudicated for, a qualified
offense may petition the court for clean slate relief under section 8 of
this act if:
(a) Such person has not been convicted of, or adjudicated for, a
misdemeanor or felony anywhere in the United States during the
eligibility period described in subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) Such person has paid all court-ordered financial obligations
related to such qualified offense.
(2) This section applies to qualified offenses committed before, on,
or after the effective date of this act.
(3) The eligibility period for qualified offenses under this section
shall be:
(a) For conviction of a qualified offense that is a Class III or
lower felony or a Class I or II misdemeanor, ten years following the date
of conviction;
(b) For an adjudication for a qualified offense that is a Class III
or lower felony or a Class I or II misdemeanor, seven years following the
date of conviction; or
(c) For a conviction of, or adjudication for, a qualified offense
that is a Class III or lower misdemeanor or an infraction, five years
-10-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
following the date of conviction or adjudication.
(4) The petition shall be filed in the court of conviction or
adjudication. There shall be no filing or docketing fee charged by the
court for the filing of a petition except for the fee authorized by this
subsection. The court may charge a filing fee in an amount set by the
State Court Administrator. The fee shall be set at an amount to recoup
the costs associated with administering the Clean Slate Act, but shall
not exceed forty dollars.
(5) The court shall provide notice of the filing of the petition to
the appropriate county attorney or city attorney within ten days. The
county attorney or city attorney shall provide notice to any victim of
the offense of the request and provide an opportunity for the victim to
provide the attorney with a statement for consideration by the court.
Within thirty days after receipt of notice, the county attorney or city
attorney may file objections to the petition and shall file any victim
statements. If no objection is timely filed, the court may grant the
petition without further hearing if the requirements of this section have
been met.
(6) If the court determines that the person in interest meets the
eligibility requirements, and the qualified offense:
(a) Is a felony, the court may grant the petition; or
(b) Is a misdemeanor or infraction, the court shall grant the
petition.
(7) The court may grant a petition for a felony if the court finds
that doing so will be in the best interest of the petitioner and
consistent with the public welfare.
(8) Upon granting a petition under this section, the court shall
issue an order for clean slate relief under section 8 of this act.
(9) An order granting or denying a petition under this section is a
final, appealable order for purposes of section 25-1902.
Sec. 8. (1) Following entry of a court order granting a person
-11-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
clean slate relief under sections 6 or 7 of this act, a criminal justice
agency shall respond to a public inquiry in the same manner as if there
were no criminal history record information and criminal history record
information shall not be disseminated to any person other than a criminal
justice agency, except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this
section.
(2) In issuing an order for clean slate relief, the court shall:
(a) Order that all records, including any information or other data
concerning any proceedings relating to the case, including the arrest,
taking into custody, petition, complaint, indictment, information, trial,
hearing, adjudication, correctional supervision, dismissal, or other
disposition or sentence, are not part of the public record and shall not
be disseminated to persons other than criminal justice agencies, except
as provided in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Send notice of the order to (i) the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice, (ii) the Nebraska State Patrol, and
(iii) law enforcement agencies, county attorneys, and city attorneys
referenced in the court record;
(c) If the order relates to an adjudication, send notice of the
order to (i) the Department of Motor Vehicles, if the adjudication
included impoundment or prohibition to obtain a license or permit
pursuant to section 43-287, and (ii) the Department of Health and Human
Services, if the person in interest was a ward of the state at the time
the proceeding was initiated or if the department was a party in the
proceeding;
(d) Order all parties notified under subdivisions (2)(b) and (c) of
this section to seal all records pertaining to the case; and
(e) If the case was transferred from one court to another, send
notice of the order to seal the record to the transferring court.
(3) In any application for employment, bonding, license, education,
or other right or privilege, any appearance as a witness, or any other
-12-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
public inquiry, a person shall not be questioned with respect to any
offense for which the record is sealed. If an inquiry is made in
violation of this subsection, the person may respond as if the offense
never occurred.
(4) A criminal justice agency may, with respect to criminal history
record information sealed under this section, disclose, disseminate,
respond to inquiries regarding, or allow inspection of such criminal
history record information:
(a) If the person in interest has made a notarized request for the
release of information, to the extent authorized in such release;
(b) If the person in interest is currently the subject of
prosecution or correctional control as the result of a separate arrest;
(c) If the person in interest is currently an announced candidate
for or holder of public office;
(d) If the criminal history record information is kept unidentified,
and the record is used for purposes of surveying or summarizing
individual or collective law enforcement agency activity or practices, or
the dissemination is requested consisting only of release of criminal
history record information showing (i) dates of arrests, (ii) reasons for
arrests, and (iii) the nature of the dispositions, including, but not
limited to, reasons for not prosecuting the case or cases;
(e) To individuals and agencies for the express purpose of research,
evaluative, or statistical activities pursuant to an agreement with a
criminal justice agency that specifically authorizes access to the
information, limits the use of the information to research, evaluative,
or statistical activities, and ensures the confidentiality and security
of the information; and
(f) In response to an inquiry for employment, security, or other
purposes to the extent disclosure of such criminal history record
information is required by:
(i) Federal law, including rules and regulations and rules and
-13-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
regulations promulgated by a self-regulatory organization created under
federal law; or
(ii) State law, including rules or regulations, relating to
operation of a motor vehicle or caring for or interacting with children,
including, but not limited to, determining whether an application filed
or a license issued under sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01, the Child Care
Licensing Act, or the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing
Licensure Act or a certificate issued under sections 79-806 to 79-815
should be denied, suspended, or revoked.
(5) In addition to disclosures authorized under subsection (4) of
this section, inspection of criminal history record information relating
to an adjudication that has been sealed under this section may be made by
the persons and for the purposes authorized in section 43-2,108.05.
Sec. 9. (1) Upon petition of the county attorney or city attorney,
and with notice to the person in interest and opportunity to be heard,
the court shall vacate an order for clean slate relief issued pursuant to
section 6 of this act if the court determines that the order was
erroneously entered and not in accordance with section 6 of this act.
(2)(a) Upon conviction of, or adjudication for, a felony or
misdemeanor, the county attorney or city attorney may file a motion
requesting the court to enter an order vacating a prior order for clean
slate relief issued pursuant to section 6 or 7 of this act.
(b) The court shall grant such motion if the new conviction is for:
(i) A felony; or
(ii) A misdemeanor that is not a qualified offense.
(c) The court may grant such motion if the new conviction is for a
misdemeanor that is a qualified offense.
(3) Upon entry of an order under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the court shall send notice of such order as provided in
subsection (2) of section 8 of this act.
Sec. 10. The State Court Administrator may adopt and promulgate
-14-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the Clean Slate Act.
Sec. 11. (1)(a) The Legislature finds that individuals serving
long-term or life sentences who are rehabilitated and ready to be safely
released from incarceration should be able to earn a second chance by
receiving a commutation of their sentences from the Board of Pardons.
Such commutation is intended to allow such rehabilitated individuals to
be responsibly reintegrated into their communities while on parole and,
if successful on parole, as fully free individuals.
(b) Second chance relief is a program through which the department,
the Division of Parole Supervision, and the Board of Parole identify
eligible committed offenders and work with them to apply for a
commutation from the Board of Pardons.
(2) The department, the Division of Parole Supervision, and the
Board of Parole shall establish a program to provide recommendations for
second chance relief as provided in this section.
(3) A committed offender serving a sentence of imprisonment,
including life imprisonment, is eligible for second chance relief under
this section as follows:
(a) For an offense committed when the offender was younger than
twenty-six years of age, after serving at least twenty-five years of a
sentence of imprisonment; or
(b) For an offense committed when the offender was twenty-six years
of age or older, after serving at least thirty years of a sentence of
imprisonment.
(4) The department shall regularly identify committed offenders who
are eligible under this section or who will become eligible within five
years. The department shall regularly provide lists of such offenders to
the Board of Parole. The board shall advise such offenders regarding the
second chance relief program and work with interested offenders to
improve their chances of obtaining second chance relief through
rehabilitation and good behavior.
-15-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
(5) In determining whether an eligible committed offender is
rehabilitated and a good candidate for second chance relief, the Board of
Parole shall:
(a) Complete a risk assessment for the committed offender; and
(b) Involve community leaders and stakeholders in the review process
to ensure that public safety and community concerns are addressed.
(6) If the Board of Parole determines that an eligible committed
offender is rehabilitated and a good candidate for second chance relief,
the board shall make a recommendation to the Board of Pardons that such
offender's sentence be commuted.
(7)(a) If the Board of Pardons receives a recommendation for second
chance relief from the Board of Parole, the Board of Pardons shall
promptly consider whether to grant a commutation of some or all of the
remainder of a committed offender's sentence to a term of parole. Such
term shall not extend longer than the remainder of the term of
imprisonment.
(b) If the Board of Pardons determines not to grant a commutation,
the board shall provide the committed offender with a list of steps or
requirements that the committed offender must satisfy to increase the
chances the committed offender will be granted a commutation at a
subsequent review. The Board of Pardons shall also provide a process for
seeking a subsequent commutation review. Upon completion of such steps or
requirements, the committed offender may petition the Board of Pardons to
grant a commutation. The Board of Pardons shall review a petition for
subsequent review and make a determination within thirty days after
receipt of such petition.
(8) If a committed offender is granted a commutation and paroled
under this section, the Board of Parole shall:
(a) Develop a detailed reentry plan tailored to the committed
offender's needs, including job placement, housing support, and access to
continuing education and mental health services;
-16-

LB215 LB215
2025 2025
(b) Provide the committed offender with access to mentorship
programs and community support networks to facilitate successful
reintegration into the community;
(c) Provide for victim and community involvement through restorative
justice programs. The Board of Parole shall offer restorative justice
opportunities, when appropriate, to allow the committed offender to make
amends with victims and the community; and
(d) Provide for accountability and monitoring by requiring regular
check-ins with parole officers and continuous monitoring during the
initial phase of reentry to ensure compliance with conditions of parole.
(9) The Board of Parole shall implement a system for ongoing
evaluation and adjustment of the second chance relief program based on
outcomes and feedback.
Sec. 12. Section 83-1,135, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,135 Sections 83-170 to 83-1,135.05 and section 11 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections
Act.
Sec. 13. Original section 83-1,135, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-17-